District of Columbia statutes.
42-3508.06

Incentives for development of single-room-occupancy housing.

(a)

The Mayor may provide tax abatements and deferral or forgiveness of water and sewer fees and other indebtedness to the District as incentives for the development of single-room-occupancy housing for low- and moderate-income tenants. These incentives shall be provided pursuant to negotiations and written agreements between the Mayor and housing providers engaged in the development or operation of single-room-occupancy housing accommodations. In these negotiations and written agreements, the Mayor may establish a formula for abating property tax liability for properties developed pursuant to this section for a period of not more than 10 years beginning during the first year that newly-constructed or rehabilitated single-room-occupancy housing becomes available for occupancy.

(b)

The incentives provided by this section shall be available for new construction, renovation of any vacant rental housing accommodation, or renovation of any non-housing property, whether vacant or not, for single-room-occupancy housing.

(c)

To qualify for the incentives provided by this section, the housing provider shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Mayor that the single-room-occupancy housing meets the following minimum standards:

(1)

Rental rates are affordable for low- and moderate-income tenants and reflect costs offset by the tax abatements and deferral or forgiveness of indebtedness to the District provided pursuant to this section;

(2)

The location is in compliance with the Zoning Regulations of the District of Columbia;

(3)

Each rental unit includes no less than 95 square feet of space, and a clothing storage unit;

(4)

Toilet and shower or bathing facilities are provided on each floor where tenants reside, in a reasonable size to meet the needs of the tenants residing on that floor;

(5)

A common-space day room, kitchen, and laundry facilities sufficient to meet the needs of all tenants at 100% occupancy are provided;

(6)

A 24-hour security system, either manual or electronic, is provided; and

(7)

The housing accommodation has a resident manager who resides on the premises.

(d)

Within 180 days from August 25, 1994, the Mayor shall compile, provide to the Council, and publish in the District of Columbia Register an initial list of District-owned and privately-owned properties in the District that are available and suitable for the development of single-room-occupancy housing in accordance with this section. At least annually thereafter, the Mayor shall publish a revised list and provide a written report to the Council regarding the status of single-room-occupancy housing development at these and other sites.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 806
as added Aug. 25, 1994, D.C. Law 10-155, § 2(d), 41 DCR 4873

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2586.

Editor's Notes

Termination of Law: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3508.01.